ko: 립라이너 디자인: 브러시; 고정; 개폐식; 기타
da: Læbeblyantdesign: Børste; Fast; Udtrækkelig; Andet
nb: Liplinerdesign: Børste; Fast; Uttrekkbar; Annet
bg-BG: Дизайн на молив за устни: Четка; Фиксиран; Прибиращ се; Други
fr: Conception du crayon à lèvres: Brosse; Fixé; Rétractable; Autre
de: Lippenkonturenstift-Design: Bürste; Befestigt; Einklappbar; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Lūpų pieštuko dizainas: Teptukas; Fiksuotas; Ištraukiamas; Kita
fi: Huultenrajauskynän muotoilu: Sivellin; Pysyvä; Sisäänvedettävä; Muu
sk-SK: Dizajn ceruzky na pery: Štetec; Pevný; Sklopný; Iné
pt-PT: Design de delineador labial: Pincel; Fixo; Retrátil; Outro
sv: Design på läppenna: Borste; Fast; Hopfällbart; Övrigt
zh-TW: 唇線筆設計: 畫筆; 固定; 可伸縮; 其他
ja: リップライナーデザイン: ブラシ; 固定; 格納式; その他
cs: Design tužky na rty: Štětec; Pevný; Zatahovací; Jiné
en: Lip liner design: Brush; Fixed; Retractable; Other
es: Diseño del perfilador de labios: Pincel; Fijo; Retráctil; Otros
hr-HR: Dizajn olovke za usne: Četka; Fiksni; Na uvlačenje; Ostalo
ro-RO: Designul creionului de buze: Perie; Fix; Retractabil; Altele
tr: Dudak kalemi tasarımı: Fırça; Sabit; Geri çekilebilir; Diğer
zh-CN: 唇线笔设计: 刷子; 固定; 可伸缩; 其他
sl-SI: Dizajn črtala za ustnice: Čopič; Fiksen; Izvlečno; Drugo
pl: Konstrukcja konturówki do ust: Pędzel; Stałe; Zwijany; Inne
el: Σχέδιο μολυβιού χειλιών: Βούρτσα; Σταθερή; Ανασυρόμενη; Άλλο
th: การออกแบบที่เขียนขอบปาก: แปรง; แบบแช่น้ำยารักษาสภาพ; แบบพับเก็บได้; อื่นๆ
it: Design della matita per labbra: Pennello; Fisso; Retrattile; Altro
hu: Ajakkontúr-ceruza kialakítása: Kefe; Rögzített; Visszahúzható; Egyéb
pt-BR: Design de delineador labial: Pincel; Fixo; Retrátil; Outro
ru: Дизайн карандаша для губ: Кисть; Фиксированный; Выдвижной; Другое
nl: Ontwerp lipliner: Borstel; Vast; Uitschuifbaar; Andere
vi: Thiết kế chì kẻ môi: Cọ; Cố định; Có thể thu vào; Khác